Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-173.02
Brand committee districts, defined.

(1) Brand committee district one means the following counties: Banner, Box Butte, Cherry, Cheyenne, Dawes, Kimball, Morrill, Scotts Bluff, Sheridan, and Sioux.

(2) Brand committee district two means the following counties: Arthur, Chase, Deuel, Dundy, Frontier, Garden, Grant, Hayes, Hitchcock, Hooker, Keith, Lincoln, Logan, McPherson, Perkins, and Thomas.

(3) Brand committee district three means the following counties: Blaine, Boyd, Brown, Custer, Garfield, Holt, Keya Paha, Knox, Loup, Rock, and Wheeler.

(4) Brand committee district four means the following counties: Buffalo, Dawson, Franklin, Furnas, Gosper, Greeley, Harlan, Howard, Kearney, Phelps, Red Willow, Sherman, and Valley.

(5) Brand committee district five means the following counties: Adams, Antelope, Boone, Burt, Butler, Cass, Cedar, Clay, Colfax, Cuming, Dakota, Dixon, Dodge, Douglas, Fillmore, Gage, Hall, Hamilton, Jefferson, Johnson, Lancaster, Madison, Merrick, Nance, Nemaha, Nuckolls, Otoe, Pawnee, Pierce, Platte, Polk, Richardson, Saline, Sarpy, Saunders, Seward, Stanton, Thayer, Thurston, Washington, Wayne, Webster, and York.

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 5.
July 18, 2026